Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202584-906.02
Public comments; notice; agency; powers and duties.

(1) In addition to seeking information by other methods and before publication of a notice under section 84-907, an agency is encouraged to and may solicit comments from the public on a subject matter of possible rule or regulation making by causing notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation of the subject matter and indicating where, when, and how persons may comment.

(2) When considering the proposal or adoption of a rule or regulation, an agency shall:

(a) Allow any person to submit comments or written materials or other documentation in support or opposition to such proposal or adoption;

(b) Allow for such submission to be accomplished electronically or by mail; and

(c) Not require a person wishing to make such a submission to travel to any particular location.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 35.